Maryland, session 2026, HB1372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–109.
(b) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Commission
shall:
(1) Adopt rules and regulations that relate to its meetings, minutes, and
transactions;
(2) Keep minutes of each meeting;
(3) Prepare annually a budget proposal that includes the estimated income
of the Commission and proposed expenses for its administration and operation;
(4) Beginning December 1, 2000, and each December 1 thereafter, submit
to the Governor, the Secretary, and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly an annual report on the operations and activities of the Commission
during the preceding fiscal year, including:
(i) A copy of each summary, compilation, and supplementary report
required by this subtitle; and

HOUSE BILL 1372 3
(ii) Any other fact, suggestion, or policy recommendation that the
Commission considers necessary; [and]
(5) Except for confidential or privileged medical or patient information,
make:
(i) Each report filed and each summary, compilation, and report
required under this subtitle available for public inspection at the office of the Commission
during regular business hours; and
(ii) Each summary, compilation, and report available to any other
State agency on request; AND
(6) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE
QUALITY, DEVELOP A PROCESS TO RECEIVE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION AND
PUBLISH IT ON THE COMMISSION’S MARYLAND QUALITY REPORTING WEBSITE FOR
EACH APPLICABLE FACILITY:
(I) THE DATE OF THE OFFICE’S MOST RECENT INSPECTION;
AND
(II) ANY ASSOCIATED RATINGS OR OTHER QUALITY METRICS
CALCULATED BY THE OFFICE BASED ON THE MOST RECENT INSPECTION; AND
(III) THE DATE OF THE NEXT SCHEDULED INSPECTION; AND
(IV) IF APPLICABLE, A STATEMENT THAT THE FACILITY HAS NOT
BEEN INSPECTED DURING THE TIME FRAME REQUIRED BY STATUTE OR
REGULATION.
Article – Health Occupations
Subtitle 1. Definitions AND POLICY.
1–102.
(a) It is the policy of the State that health occupations should be regulated and
controlled as provided in this article to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public.
(b) The health occupations boards established by this article, the majority of
whose members are licensed or certified under this article, are created to function as
independent boards, with the intent that a peer group is best qualified to regulate, control,
and otherwise discipline in a fair and unbiased manner the licensees or certificate holders
who practice in the State.

HOUSE BILL 1372
1–103.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CENTRALIZATION COMMISSION.
(B) THERE IS A MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CENTRALIZATION
COMMISSION.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO PROVIDE ONGOING ADVICE
AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON HOW BEST TO IMPROVE
THE RELATIONSHIP INCREASE COLLABORATION BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND
THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARDS TO ACHIEVE GREATER EFFICIENCY,
TRANSPARENCY, AND ACCOUNTABILITY.
(D) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE DEPUTY SECRETARY FOR PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES;
(5) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE BOARD OF NURSING,
OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(6) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICIANS, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE BOARD OF
PHARMACY, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(8) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE BOARD OF SOCIAL
WORK EXAMINERS, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(9) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE BOARD OF
ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALISTS, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE THREE MEMBERS WHO ARE THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS, OR THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS’ DESIGNEES, OF HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARDS NOT

HOUSE BILL 1372 5
OTHERWISE REPRESENTED ON THE COMMISSION, DESIGNATED JOINTLY BY THE
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARDS NOT OTHERWISE REPRESENTED ON THE
COMMISSION; AND
(10) ANY ADDITIONAL MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY
COCHAIRS THAT THE SECRETARY DETERMINES COCHAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH
THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARDS, DETERMINE TO BE NECESSARY TO
ACCOMPLISH THE GOALS OF THE COMMISSION.
(E) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE, SHALL CHAIR THE
MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND AND THE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF
DELEGATES APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION SHALL COCHAIR
THE COMMISSION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES SHALL PROVIDE STAFF
FOR THE COMMISSION.
(G) (1) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE SHALL DESIGNATE A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATION
BOARD TO SERVE AS A LIAISON TO BE AVAILABLE TO WORK WITH THE COMMISSION.
(2) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD SHALL PROVIDE, AS SOON AS
PRACTICABLE BUT NOT LATER THAN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A
REQUEST, ANY INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(H) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING HOW BEST TO GRANT
AUTHORITY TO THE DEPARTMENT TO ENSURE THAT:
(I) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD REMEDIES AUDIT
FINDINGS AND VIOLATIONS OF LAW, REGULATION, OR POLICY; AND
(II) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD ESTABLISHES POLICIES
AND PROCEDURES FOR, AS APPLICABLE:

HOUSE BILL 1372
1. THE TIMELY PROCESSING OF APPLICATIONS;
2. RESPONDING TO COMPLAINTS;
3. CONDUCTING INVESTIGATIONS AND INSPECTIONS;
4. CONDUCTING CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECKS,
INCLUDING THE RECEIPT OF REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY INFORMATION FROM THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF AN INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK;
5. THE COLLECTION OF FEES AND THE ACCOUNTING OF
FINANCIAL ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING THE ASSESSMENT OF PENALTIES FOR
VIOLATIONS OF THOSE POLICIES AND PROCEDURES;
6. TAKING APPROPRIATE ACTIONS FOR LICENSE
APPLICATION FRAUD, INCLUDING THE ASSESSMENT OF FINES; AND
7. ANY OTHER AREAS IN WHICH ACTION IS NEEDED, AS
DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY COMMISSION; AND
(2) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS ON HOW BEST TO:
(I) ESTABLISH A SINGLE, COMPREHENSIVE LICENSURE
SYSTEM TO BE USED BY ALL HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARDS;
(II) AUTHORIZE THE USE OF HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD
REGULATORY FEES TO SUPPORT THE SINGLE, COMPREHENSIVE LICENSURE
SYSTEM;
(I) ESTABLISHING A COMPREHENSIVE LICENSURE SYSTEM
THAT MAY BE USED BY A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD;
(II) AUTHORIZING A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT USES
THE COMPREHENSIVE LICENSURE SYSTEM TO USE LICENSE FEES TO SUPPORT THE
SYSTEM;
(III) CONSOLIDATE CONSOLIDATING ADMINISTRATIVE
FUNCTIONS TO ESTABLISH AND ENHANCE EFFICIENCY AND CONTROL IN ALL AREAS,
INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF EXISTING DEPARTMENT SYSTEMS FOR E–MAIL,
FINANCE, AND HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES ACROSS ALL HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
BOARDS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1372 7
(IV) INCREASE INCREASING PUBLIC AWARENESS AND USAGE OF
THE MARYLAND QUALITY REPORTING WEBSITE OF THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE
COMMISSION TO ASSIST INDIVIDUALS WITH SELECTING APPROPRIATE HEALTH
CARE SETTINGS.
(J) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN
2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS,
INCLUDING ANY DRAFT LEGISLATION, TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE
COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE HEALTH COMMITTEE, AND THE JOINT AUDIT AND
EVALUATION COMMITTEE.
1–104.
THE SECRETARY OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SHALL ENSURE THAT
MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY REQUIREMENTS ARE MET BY ALL HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
BOARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD
SHALL CERTIFY TO THE SECRETARY OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY THAT THE
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS USED BY THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD
MEET THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Health
Centralization Commission established under § 1–103 of the Health Occupations Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall hold its first meeting on or before July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.